Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB590.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.5161 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Education[Educational] institution" means an in-state public or private
postsecondary education[educational] institution; and
(b) "Spouse" means an individual who is married to a member of the Kentucky
National Guard and verified in the Defense Enrollment Eligibility
Reporting System database.
(2) (a) The General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky establishes the
National Guard Tuition Scholarship[Award] Program to provide members of
the Kentucky National Guard and their spouses the opportunity to attend an
in-state education[educational] institution.
(b) The amount of the scholarship awarded[tuition paid] shall be up to or equal
to the in-state full or part-time tuition rate and mandatory student fees[rate]
of the education institution the member or his or her spouse attends.
(c) The amount of the scholarship awarded[except that tuition paid] in support
of a member or his or her spouse attending a private postsecondary
educational institution shall be up to or equal to the average in-state full or
part-time tuition rate and fees of a public university or community college.
Until the appropriation for the tuition scholarship[assistance] program of the
Department of Military Affairs is first fully funded by the General Assembly,
a scholarship[tuition for a member] to attend a private institution under this
section shall not be awarded[paid].
(d) The tuition scholarship[award] program shall be established in the Kentucky
Higher Education Assistance Authority, and moneys shall be available for all
education institution programs that lead to a postsecondary credential,
Page 1 of 3
XXXX 1/30/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1758
certificate, license, or degree, including graduate and postgraduate degree
programs, offered by the institutions set out in this subsection.
(3) (a) Each member of the Kentucky National Guard and the member's spouse
shall collectively be entitled to a scholarship award for not more than one
hundred thirty (130) hours of tuition under the tuition scholarship program.
(b) The total number of credit hours available for the member and the
member's spouse may be transferred between the member and his or her
spouse and used concurrently until depleted.
(c) A member of the Kentucky National Guard or the member's spouse shall
not use the National Guard Scholarship Program concurrently with the
Work Ready Kentucky Scholarship Program established in KRS 164.787.
(4) (a) The adjutant general may grant a current member of the Kentucky National
Guard up to forty-five (45) paid credit hours in addition to the scholarship
described in subsection (3) of this section at any postsecondary institution
for an area of study that will have material benefits to the operations of the
National Guard.
(b) The additional hours awarded under this subsection shall not be
transferable.
(5) The Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority pursuant to KRS Chapter
13A, shall promulgate administrative regulations necessary to the financial
management of the tuition scholarship[award] program.
(6)[(4)] The Department of Military Affairs[, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A], shall
promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
concerning:
(a) The eligibility of members and their spouses to participate in the tuition
scholarship[award] program established in this section; and
(b) The areas of study eligible for the award of additional hours under
Page 2 of 3
XXXX 1/30/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1758
subsection (4) of this section.
Section 2. KRS 164.5165 is amended to read as follows:
Any active member of the Kentucky National Guard who is not a Kentucky resident shall
qualify for the tuition scholarship program[award] benefits provided by KRS 164.516 to
164.5169 subject to the following conditions:
(1) The member enrolls in an education[educational] institution within this state; and
(2) The tuition scholarship program[award] benefits provided to the out-of-state
member shall not exceed an amount equivalent to the in-state tuition amount the
member would have received if the member were a Kentucky resident.
Section 3. KRS 164.5169 is amended to read as follows:
Upon certification by the Department of Military Affairs that the member is eligible, the
Kentucky Higher Education Assistance Authority shall, to the extent that funds have been
appropriated and are available to the National Guard Tuition Scholarship[Award]
Program, pay to the education[educational] institution an amount up to or equal to the in-
state tuition costs of full-time or part-time study.
Page 3 of 3
XXXX 1/30/2026 2:16 PM Jacketed